Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1396
Employee with access and use of protected tax information; criminal history record checks; required, when; procedure.

(1) Any employee of a state agency whom the agency determines may directly access and use protected federal or state tax information as part of the employee's authorized duties shall be fingerprinted and undergo state and national criminal history record checks.

(2) The Nebraska State Patrol is authorized to submit the fingerprints of such employees to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and to issue a report to the employing state agency that includes the criminal history record information concerning the employee.

(3) The employing state agency shall use the information obtained from fingerprinting and an employee's criminal history only for purposes of verifying the employee's identification and determining the employee's suitability to perform the duties which are the basis for requiring that the employee submit to fingerprinting and state and national criminal history record checks.

(4) The cost of fingerprinting and state and national criminal history record information checks shall be paid by the employing state agency.

(5) For purposes of this section, state agency means the Department of Banking and Finance, the Department of Economic Development, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Labor, and the Department of Revenue.

Laws 2022, LB769, § 1.